Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5704.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2. (1) "Authorized emergency vehicle" means any 1 of the following: (a) Vehicles of the fire department, police vehicles, ambulances, privately owned motor vehicles of volunteer or paid fire fighters, or volunteer members of an emergency rescue unit if authorized by the chief of an organized fire department, a county sheriff, or the director of the department of state police, or privately owned motor vehicles of volunteer or paid members of a life support agency licensed by the department of licensing and regulatory affairs if authorized by the life support agency. (b) For purposes of section 698(5)(c) during an emergency, a vehicle owned and operated by a federally recognized nonprofit charitable organization that is used exclusively for assistance during that emergency. (c) For purposes of section 653a, a road service vehicle either of the following giving a visual signal by means of a flashing, rotating, or oscillating red or amber light: . As used in this subdivision, "road service vehicle" means a vehicle that is clearly marked and readily recognizable as a vehicle used to assist disabled vehicles. (i) A road service vehicle. (ii) A road work vehicle. (2) As used in this section: (a) "Emergency rescue unit" means an entity with training in a specialized discipline exceeding the level of training for medical first responders. (b) "Life support agency" means that term as defined in section 20906 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.20906. (c) "Medical first responder" means that term as defined in section 20906 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.20906. (d) "Road service vehicle" means a vehicle that is clearly marked and readily recognizable as a vehicle used to assist disabled vehicles. (e) "Road work vehicle" means a vehicle that is used to perform road work, including, but not limited to, construction, hazard removal, maintenance, public utility work, reconstruction, repair, resurfacing, or surveying. Sec. 653a. (1) Upon approaching and passing a stationary authorized emergency vehicle that is giving a visual signal by means of flashing, rotating, or oscillating red, blue, white, or amber, or green lights as permitted by section 698, or by means of front and rear warning lamps as permitted by section 698a, the driver of an approaching vehicle shall exhibit due care and caution, as required under the following: (a) On any public roadway with at least 2 adjacent lanes proceeding in the same direction of the stationary authorized emergency vehicle, the driver of the approaching vehicle shall proceed with caution, reduce his or her the vehicle's speed by at least 10 miles per hour below the posted speed limit, and yield the right-of-way by moving into a lane at least 1 moving lane or 2 vehicle widths apart from the stationary authorized emergency vehicle, unless directed otherwise by a police officer. If movement to an adjacent lane or 2 vehicle widths apart is not possible due to weather, road conditions, or the immediate presence of vehicular or pedestrian traffic in parallel moving lanes, the driver of the approaching vehicle shall proceed as required in subdivision (b). (b) On any public roadway that does not have at least 2 adjacent lanes proceeding in the same direction as the stationary authorized emergency vehicle, or if the movement by the driver of the vehicle into an adjacent lane or 2 vehicle widths apart is not possible as described in subdivision (a), the approaching vehicle driver shall proceed with due care and caution and reduce his or her the vehicle's speed by at least 10 miles per hour below the posted speed limit, or as directed by a police officer. (2) Except as provided in this subsection and subsections (3) and (4), a person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than $500.00 or imprisonment for not more than 90 days, or both. Beginning 60 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that amended this subsection, except as provided in subsections (3) and (4), a person an individual who violates this section is responsible for a civil infraction and shall be ordered to pay a civil fine of $400.00.as follows: (a) For an individual who violates this section except as described in subdivision (b), $400.00. (b) For an individual who violates this section and the stationary vehicle is an authorized emergency vehicle with a police officer, firefighter, or other emergency response personnel present, $750.00. (3) A person An individual who violates this section and causes injury to a police officer, firefighter, or other emergency response personnel in the immediate area of the a stationary authorized emergency vehicle is guilty of a felony punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000.00 or imprisonment for not more than 2 years, or both. (4) A person An individual who violates this section and causes death to a police officer, firefighter, or other emergency response personnel in the immediate area of the a stationary authorized emergency vehicle is guilty of a felony punishable by a fine of not more than $7,500.00 or by imprisonment for not more than 15 years, or both. (5) The operator driver of a vehicle upon on a highway that has been divided into 2 roadways by leaving an intervening space, or by a physical barrier or clearly indicated dividing sections so constructed as to impede vehicular traffic, is not required to proceed with caution, reduce his or her the vehicle's speed, or yield the right-of-way for an authorized emergency a stationary vehicle that is stopped across the dividing space, barrier, or section. Sec. 907. (1) A violation of this act, or a local ordinance that substantially corresponds to a provision of this act, that is designated a civil infraction must not be considered a lesser included offense of a criminal offense. (2) Permission may be granted for payment of a civil fine and costs to be made within a specified period of time or in specified installments but, unless permission is included in the order or judgment, the civil fine and costs must be payable immediately. Except as otherwise provided, a person found responsible or responsible "with explanation" for a civil infraction must pay costs as provided in subsection (4) and 1 or more of the following civil fines, as applicable: (a) Except as otherwise provided, for a civil infraction under this act or a local ordinance that substantially corresponds to a provision of this act, the person must be ordered to pay a civil fine of not more than $100.00. (b) If the civil infraction was a moving violation that resulted in an at-fault collision with another vehicle, an individual, or any other object, the civil fine ordered under this section is increased by $25.00 but the total civil fine must not be more than $100.00. (c) For a violation of section 240, the civil fine ordered under this section is $15.00. (d) For a violation of section 312a(4)(a), the civil fine ordered under this section must not be more than $250.00. (e) For a first violation of section 319f(1), the civil fine ordered under this section must not be less than $2,500.00 or more than $2,750.00; for a second or subsequent violation, the civil fine must not be less than $5,000.00 or more than $5,500.00. (f) For a violation of section 319g(1)(a), the civil fine ordered under this section must not be more than $10,000.00. (g) For a violation of section 319g(1)(g), the civil fine ordered under this section must not be less than $2,750.00 or more than $25,000.00. (h) For a violation of section 602b, the civil fine ordered under this section must be as follows: (i) For a violation of section 602b(1), either of the following: (A) If the violation does not involve an accident, $100.00 for a first offense and $250.00 for a second or subsequent offense. (B) If the violation involves an accident, $200.00 for a first offense and $500.00 for a second or subsequent offense. (ii) For a violation of section 602b(2), either of the following: (A) If the violation does not involve an accident, $200.00 for a first offense and $500.00 for a second or subsequent offense. (B) If the violation involves an accident, $400.00 for a first offense and $1,000.00 for a second or subsequent offense. (i) For a violation of section 627c, the civil fine ordered under this section must not be more than $150.00 for a second violation as described in section 627c(2)(b) and $300.00 for a third or subsequent violation described in section 627c(2)(c). (j) For a violation of section 653a(2), the civil fine ordered under this section must be either of the following: (i) For a violation described in section 653a(2)(a), $400.00. (ii) For a violation described in section 653a(2)(b), $750.00. (k) (j) For a violation of section 674(1)(s) or a local ordinance that substantially corresponds to section 674(1)(s), the civil fine ordered under this section must not be less than $100.00 or more than $250.00. (l) (k) For a violation of section 676a(3), the civil fine ordered under this section must not be more than $10.00. (m) (l) For a violation of section 676c, the civil fine ordered under this section is $1,000.00. (n) (m) For a violation of section 682 or a local ordinance that substantially corresponds to section 682, the civil fine ordered under this section must not be less than $100.00 or more than $500.00. (o) (n) For a violation of section 710d, the civil fine ordered under this section must not be more than $10.00, subject to subsection (11). (p) (o) For a violation of section 710e, the civil fine and court costs ordered under this subsection must be $25.00. (3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, if an individual is determined to be responsible or responsible "with explanation" for a civil infraction under this act or a local ordinance that substantially corresponds to a provision of this act while driving a commercial motor vehicle, the individual must be ordered to pay costs as provided in subsection (4) and a civil fine of not more than $250.00. (4) If a civil fine is ordered under subsection (2) or (3), the judge or district court magistrate shall summarily tax and determine the costs of the action, which are not limited to the costs taxable in ordinary civil actions, and may include all expenses, direct and indirect, to which the plaintiff has been put in connection with the civil infraction, up to the entry of judgment. Costs must not be ordered in excess of $100.00. A civil fine ordered under subsection (2) or (3) must not be waived unless costs ordered under this subsection are waived. Except as otherwise provided by law, costs are payable to the general fund of the plaintiff. (5) In addition to a civil fine and costs ordered under subsection (2) or (3) and subsection (4) and the justice system assessment ordered under subsection (12), the judge or district court magistrate may order the individual to attend and complete a program of treatment, education, or rehabilitation. (6) A district court magistrate shall impose the sanctions permitted under subsections (2), (3), and (5) only to the extent expressly authorized by the chief judge or only judge of the district court district. (7) Each district of the district court and each municipal court may establish a schedule of civil fines, costs, and assessments to be imposed for civil infractions that occur within the respective district or city. If a schedule is established, it must be prominently posted and readily available for public inspection. A schedule need not include all violations that are designated by law or ordinance as civil infractions. A schedule may exclude cases on the basis of a defendant's prior record of civil infractions or traffic offenses, or a combination of civil infractions and traffic offenses. (8) The state court administrator shall annually publish and distribute to each district and court a recommended range of civil fines and costs for first-time civil infractions. This recommendation is not binding on the courts that have jurisdiction over civil infractions but is intended to act as a normative guide for judges and district court magistrates and a basis for public evaluation of disparities in the imposition of civil fines and costs throughout this state. (9) If a person has received a civil infraction citation for defective safety equipment on a vehicle under section 683, the court shall waive a civil fine, costs, and assessments on receipt of certification by a law enforcement agency that repair of the defective equipment was made before the appearance date on the citation. (10) A default in the payment of a civil fine or costs ordered under subsection (2), (3), or (4) or a justice system assessment ordered under subsection (12), or an installment of the fine, costs, or assessment, may be collected by a means authorized for the enforcement of a judgment under chapter 40 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.4001 to 600.4065, or under chapter 60 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.6001 to 600.6098. (11) Before the effective date of 2024 PA 22, April 2, 2025, the court may waive any civil fine, cost, or assessment against an individual who received a civil infraction citation for a violation of section 710d if the individual, before the appearance date on the citation, supplies the court with evidence of acquisition, purchase, or rental of a child seating system meeting the requirements of section 710d. Beginning on the effective date of 2024 PA 22, April 2, 2025, the court may waive any civil fine, cost, or assessment against an individual who received a civil infraction citation for a violation of section 710d if the individual, before the appearance date on the citation, supplies the court with evidence of acquisition of a child seating system that meets the requirements of section 710d and evidence that the individual has received education from a certified child passenger safety technician. (12) In addition to any civil fines or costs ordered to be paid under this section, the judge or district court magistrate shall order the defendant to pay a justice system assessment of $40.00 for each civil infraction determination, except for a parking violation or a violation for which the total fine and costs imposed are $10.00 or less. On payment of the assessment, the clerk of the court shall transmit the assessment collected to the state treasury to be deposited into the justice system fund created in section 181 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.181. An assessment levied under this subsection is not a civil fine for purposes of section 909. (13) If a person has received a citation for a violation of section 223, the court shall waive any civil fine, costs, and assessment on receipt of certification by a law enforcement agency that the person, before the appearance date on the citation, produced a valid registration certificate that was valid on the date the violation of section 223 occurred. (14) If a person has received a citation for a violation of section 328(1) for failing to produce a certificate of insurance under section 328(2), the court may waive the fee described in section 328(3)(c) and shall waive any fine, costs, and any other fee or assessment otherwise authorized under this act on receipt of verification by the court that the person, before the appearance date on the citation, produced valid proof of insurance that was in effect when the violation of section 328(1) occurred. Insurance obtained after the violation occurred does not make the person eligible for a waiver under this subsection. (15) If a person is determined to be responsible or responsible "with explanation" for a civil infraction under this act or a local ordinance that substantially corresponds to a provision of this act and the civil infraction arises out of the ownership or operation of a commercial quadricycle, the person must be ordered to pay costs as provided in subsection (4) and a civil fine of not more than $500.00. (16) As used in this section, "moving violation" means an act or omission prohibited under this act or a local ordinance that substantially corresponds to this act that involves the operation of a motor vehicle and for which a fine may be assessed. Enacting section 1. Section 653b of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.653b, is repealed. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01383'25) or House Bill No. 5702 (request no. H01383'25). (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01383'25 a) or House Bill No. 5703 (request no. H01383'25 a).